Illinois, session 104th, HB3972.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Department of Human Services Act.9(Source: P.A. 89-507, eff. 7-3-96.)